California, session 20252026, AB1373.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13160 of the Water Code is amended to read:13160. (a) The state board is designated as the state water pollution control agency for all purposes stated in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) and any other existing or subsequently enacted federal water quality control law.(b) (1) The state board is authorized to give any certificate or statement required by any federal agency pursuant to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or any other federal water quality control law that there is reasonable assurance that an activity of any person subject to the jurisdiction of the state board will comply with applicable requirements of that federal law or any other appropriate requirements of state law.(2) (A) For a license to operate a hydroelectric facility, if requested by the applicant within 14 days of an initial draft certification being issued, the state board shall hold a public hearing at least 21 days before acting on the application for certification. If a public hearing is requested on the draft certification, the authority to issue that certification for a license to operate a hydroelectric facility shall not be delegated. The public hearing may be conducted as part of a regularly scheduled state board meeting, provided that the hearing is specifically noticed and allows for public comment on the certification application.(B) The state board may include in its fee schedule for hydroelectric facility applicants, pursuant to Section 13160.1, an amount not to exceed the reasonable costs incurred by the state board in holding a public hearing or issuing a certification for a license to operate a hydroelectric facility when the authority to issue that certification could not be delegated, pursuant to subparagraph (A).(3) The state board may issue the certificate or statement under paragraph (1) before completion of the environmental review required under Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code if the state board determines that waiting until completion of that environmental review to issue the certificate or statement poses a substantial risk of waiver of the state board’s certification authority under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or any other federal water quality control law. To the extent authorized by federal law, the state board shall reserve authority to reopen and, after public notice, an opportunity for comment, and, when appropriate, an opportunity for a hearing, revise the certificate or statement as appropriate to incorporate feasible measures to avoid or reduce significant environmental impacts or to make any necessary findings based on the information provided in the environmental document prepared for the project.(c) The state board is authorized to exercise any powers delegated to the state and carry out any program a state is authorized to administer under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) and any amendments to that act.